Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1301
Declaration of purpose.

The Legislature finds that in order to insure the economic security of Nebraskans of retirement age it is necessary to require those persons who develop retirement subdivisions and communities to make a full and periodic disclosure of their fiscal condition.

The Legislature also finds it to be in the best interest of the tenants of a retirement subdivision or community, as well as in the best tradition of participatory democracy, that such tenants have a voice in the affairs of the subdivision or community through representation on the board of directors or an advisory committee to the board, when the retirement subdivision or community is owned and managed by a nonprofit entity.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 978, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 1.